Utah statutes.
10-9a-607.   Dedication of streets and other public places.

(1)  A plat that is signed, dedicated, and acknowledged by each owner of record, and approved according to the procedures specified in this part, operates, when recorded, as a dedication of all streets and other public places, and vests the fee of those parcels of land in the municipality for the public for the uses named or intended in the plat.

(2)  The dedication established by this section does not impose liability upon the municipality for streets and other public places that are dedicated in this manner but are unimproved.



Amended by Chapter 381, 2010 General Session

